Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.120

Administering funds—Preference to an evergreen community.

When administering funds under this chapter, the board shall give preference only to an evergreen community recognized under RCW 76.15.090 in comparison to other entities that are eligible to receive evergreen community designation. Entities not eligible for designation as an evergreen community shall not be given less preferential treatment than an evergreen community.

[ 2021 c 209 s 17; 2008 c 299 s 30.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 209: See note following RCW 76.15.005.

Short title—2008 c 299: See note following RCW 76.15.020.